Washington statutes.
RCW 41.80.911

Review of appropriateness of certain collective bargaining units.

(1) By January 1, 2012, the public employment relations commission may review the appropriateness of the collective bargaining units transferred under RCW 43.19.900, 43.19.901, 43.19.902, 43.330.910, and * 43.41A.900. The employer or the exclusive bargaining representative may petition the public employment relations commission to review the bargaining units in accordance with this section.

(2) If the commission determines that an existing collective bargaining unit is appropriate pursuant to RCW 41.80.070, the exclusive bargaining representative certified to represent the bargaining unit prior to January 1, 2012, shall continue as the exclusive bargaining representative without the necessity of an election.

(3) If the commission determines that existing collective bargaining units are not appropriate, the commission may modify the units and order an election pursuant to RCW 41.80.080. Certified bargaining representatives will not be required to demonstrate a showing of interest to be included on the ballot.

(4) The commission may require an election pursuant to RCW 41.80.080 if similarly situated employees are represented by more than one employee organization. Certified bargaining representatives will not be required to demonstrate a showing of interest to be included on the ballot.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 1001.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41A.900 was recodified as RCW 43.105.907 pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 221.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.